Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, SB1414.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 318 of the act of February 9, 1999 (P.L.1, No.1), known as the Capital Facilities Debt Enabling Act, is amended by adding a subsection to read:Section 318. Administration of redevelopment assistance capital projects.* * *(l) Incomplete project.--An applicant of a redevelopment assistance capital project in which funding was approved shall notify the secretary if the project cannot be completed and the amount of the project grant approved for the project will not be utilized for the original project scope under this section. The secretary may not reallocate the amount of the project grant 1234567891011121314151617181920 approved for the project that remains unexpended, unencumbered or uncommitted to a redevelopment assistance capital project itemized under subsection (a) in a county other than the county in which the redevelopment assistance capital project was originally itemized under this section.Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20260SB1414PN1873 - 2 - 123456